Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-203
Chief Water Officer; seal; certified copies of records; admissibility as evidence.

The Chief Water Officer shall adopt a seal. Copies of all records or other instruments related to the duties of the Chief Water Officer in the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment when certified by the Chief Water Officer as true copies and bearing the seal thereof shall be received in any court as prima facie evidence of the original record or instruments.

Laws 1957, c. 365, § 21, p. 1241;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-703;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 329.